District of Columbia statutes.
20-311

Nature of proceeding.

(a)

An abbreviated probate proceeding is a proceeding for the probate of a will or a determination of a decedent’s intestacy and for the appointment of a personal representative. This proceeding is instituted when an interested person files a petition for an abbreviated probate proceeding with the Court in accordance with the provisions of section 20-304. This proceeding may be conducted without the prior notice required for standard probate under section 20-323.

(b)

The finality of abbreviated probate shall be governed by section 20-331.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(l), 42 DCR 63

History

This section is referenced in § 20-101.

Section References

1981 Ed., § 20-311.

Prior Codifications

Application of Law 10-241: See Application of Law 10-241 and Emergency act amendment notes to § 20-304.

Editor's Notes